Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-11,129
Rehabilitation services; unlawful acts.

It shall be unlawful, except for purposes directly connected with the administration of the vocational rehabilitation program and in accordance with regulations, for any person or persons to solicit, disclose, receive, or make use of or authorize, knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce in the use of any list of, names of, or any information concerning persons applying for or receiving vocational rehabilitation, directly or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files, or communications of the state or subdivisions or agencies thereof or acquired in the course of the performance of official duties, except in response to summons, subpoena, or other order of a court.

Laws 1955, c. 324, § 9, p. 1005;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1454;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 911.